Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-845
Department of Correctional Services; Department of Health and Human Services; contract with teaching staff; probationary period.

Any contract of employment entered into after July 1, 1984, between the teaching staff and the Department of Correctional Services or the Department of Health and Human Services which applies to the first two years of the employment of such teaching staff shall provide that the first two years of the employment of such teacher are a probationary period. Any such contract may be terminated during the probationary period without cause.

Laws 1980, LB 442, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 9, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1254.09;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 475;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 819.